Florida, session 2026, SPB7010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âSubsection (15) is added to section 112.215, 20 Florida Statutes, to read: 21 112.215âGovernment employees; deferred compensation 22 program.â 23 (15)âNotwithstanding the requirements in paragraphs (6)(a) 24 and (b) that deferred compensation not be included in the 25 employeeâs taxable income until actually received by the 26 employee under the terms of the plan, a deferred compensation 27 plan established pursuant to this section may offer to all 28 eligible employees a qualified Roth contribution program in 29 accordance with s. 402A of the Internal Revenue Code. 30 Section 2.âSection 71 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, 31 is repealed. 32 Section 3.âThe Legislature hereby ratifies the actions of 33 the Chief Financial Officer which permitted, for purposes of the 34 state deferred compensation plan established pursuant to s. 35 112.215, Florida Statutes, contributions to a qualified Roth 36 contribution program in accordance with section 402A of the 37 Internal Revenue Code beginning July 1, 2024. 38 Section 4.âThis act shall operate retroactively to January 39 1, 2026. 40 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.